





Theeuwes, Felix - The Wall Street Transcript













































 





































Felix  Theeuwes
FELIX THEEUWES is Chairman, co-Founder, and Chief Scientific Officer at
DURECT Corporation, established in July 1998 as a spinout from ALZA
Corporation to focus on the development of pharmaceutical systems and
products to treat chronic debilitating diseases and enabling
biotechnology drugs. Dr. Theeuwes was with ALZA Corporation from 1970
until June 1999, holding positions directing research, technology
development and product development for a variety of controlled drug
delivery systems. His work led to the product introduction of the ALZET’
mini osmotic pump series for animal research, and the OROS’ systems
series of products. He directed research in transdermal research and
development, initiated the electrotransport/iontophoresis program, and
initiated the DUROS’ osmotic implant program. He holds more than 210 US
patents covering these systems and published more than 80 articles and
book chapters. In 1980 Dr. Theeuwes was named Inventor of the Year by
the Peninsula Patent Law Association. In 1983 he was the recipient of
the Award for the Advancement of Industrial Pharmacy. He was the Busse
Lecturer at the University of Wisconsin in 1981, and in 1985 the Third
Annual Sidney Riegelman Lecturer at the University of California, San
Francisco. He is a Fellow of the American Association of Pharmaceutical
Scientists. In 1993 he became the first recipient of ALZA Corporation’s
Founder’s Award. Dr. Theeuwes is a member of the Board of Directors at
Genetronics, Inc., and DURECT Corporation and was formerly a member of
the Scientific Advisory Board at Antigenics. In 1993 Dr. Theeuwes
completed the Stanford Executive Program. He received his undergraduate
and graduate education in Physics at the University of Leuven (Louvain),
Belgium, with a DSc degree in 1966. From 1966 to 1970 he served as a
post-doctoral fellow and visiting Research Assistant Professor in the
Department of Chemistry, University of Kansas.
Related Interviews:J.brown / F.theeuwes - Durect Corporation (drrx)October 27, 2004J.brown / F.theeuwes - Durect Corporation (drrx)October 26, 2004







CartLatest NewsJames Abate of Centre Asset Management Sees Consumer Demand Driving New Stock HighsMalcolm E. Polley of Stewart Capital and How to Play the Health Care StocksTimothy Biltz, CEO of Lumos Networks Identifies the Key Component for Future 5G NetworksThe Wall Street Transcript is a completely unique resource for investors and business researchers.Over 20,000 CEO, Equity Analyst and Money Manager InterviewsSubscribe now!Sign Up For Newsletter Weekly email with New In-Depth Interviews


Email: 



Most Popular InterviewsProtecting Assets Through a Rules-Based FundPaula R. Wieck Published July 24, 2017 in Investing StrategiesBuy ($25)Managing Risk Through Strict Quality StandardsJeffrey P. CornellMichael S. Jordan Published July 24, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: AAPL GOOG SAP NSRGY Buy ($25)Identifying Emerging-Market and International Stocks with a Bottom-Up ProcessRahul  Sharma Published July 24, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: 600690 GE ASX TSM HDFC LUKOY XOM TOT RDS/A IBULHSGFIN ARCLK Buy ($25)Most Popular ReportsInvesting Strategies Published July 24, 2017Buy ($175)Wireless Communications & Telecom Published July 14, 2017Buy ($175)Investing Strategies Published July 11, 2017Buy ($175) 






Top Company Interviews






Register for a Free Account to gain greater access to
            The Wall Street Transcript right now




CEO INTERVIEWSInterview with the President and CEO: Lumos Networks Corp. (NASDAQ:LMOS)Interview with the Corporate VP of Business Development, Strategy and Investor Relations: DSP Group, Inc. (NASDAQ:DSPG)Interview with the CEO and Director: Tactile Systems Technology, Inc. (NASDAQ:TCMD) 

SECTOR ROUNDTABLESNatural Gas Weighs Heavy On E&P Near-Term ProspectsRoundtable Forum:optimism Despite Uncertainty In For-profit EducationRoundtable Forum:a Shift In Focus To Natural Gas From Oil 

MONEY MANAGER INTERVIEWSProtecting Assets Through a Rules-Based FundManaging Risk Through Strict Quality StandardsIdentifying Emerging-Market and International Stocks with a Bottom-Up Process 

ANALYST INTERVIEWSAnalyzing the Secular Drivers Within Communications Infrastructure and TelecomSatellite Companies Benefiting from Growth in Data TrafficIncreased Focus on Content as Consumers Shift to Digital Consumption 




Subscribe Today!







                Since 1963
                © The Wall Street Transcript 1997-2016
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy  
            





https://www.twst.com/wp-admin/admin-ajax.php

Pin It on Pinterest





































Share This





Twitter





Facebook





Google+





Gmail





LinkedIn








































×





Join now for free!
Already a member?






First Name 





Last Name 





Email address *








Create new account
 


or create an account with a social network.

Join with Facebook


Join with Twitter


Join with Google








Username or Email address: *





Password: *






LoginJoin now! | Forgot password?
 


or login using a social network


Log in with Facebook


Log in with Twitter


Log in with Google












   Felix Theeuwes | DURECT Corporation | ZoomInfo.comFelix Theeuwes — Durect Results - PharmaVOICE  : PharmaVOICE                                        READ. THINK. PARTICIPATE.    SUBSCRIBE | REGISTER | LOG IN XSite Login Username  Password  Lost your password?  Don't have an account?Click here to register for free.Benefits of Registered UsersRegistered user can access and download all content.Have a Question?Email Customer ServiceCall (215)321-8656Proceed as Guest  Download as Guest Guests must provide the below information each time you download content from PharmaVOICE.com.Content will be sent to your inbox. Email *   First Name *    Last Name *   Title *  Company *    Don't have an account?Click here to register.Benefits of Registered Users Registered user can access and
download all content without
inputting information multiple
times for multiple downloadsGet your free subscription to PharmaVOICE MagazineClick one of the links below to pick what type of subscription you'd like.  It's completely free. PharmaVOICE Print and Digital Subscription PharmaVOICE Digital Subscription Only PharmaVOICE Print Subscription OnlyAlready subscribed?Click here to loginHave a Question?Email Customer ServiceCall (215)321-8656Forgot your password?Fill out the form below and we will email you a new one.  All you have to do is check your mail and you will be directed back to PharmaVOICE.com Email or Username  Remember your password?Click here to login.Have a Question?Contact Customer ServiceNewsBlogR&DCommercialOperationsCurrent IssueMagazineCurrent IssueDigital EditionArchivesEditorialAdvertiseCirculationReprintsList RentalsSubscribePharmaVOICE 100PharmaVOICE 100 CelebrationNominateSubmission GuidelinesCurrent 100Red Jacket AwardContact EditorResourcesArticlesCase StudieseBooksPodcastsWebinarsWhite PapersVideosEventsPharmaVOICE 100 CelebrationIndustry EventsWebinarsEditorialEditorial CalendarEditorial ScopePhotography GuidelinesPharmaVOICE 100Innovation IssueContact EditorAdvertisePrint AdvertisingOnline AdvertisingE-mail AdvertisingMarketing SolutionsTerms and ConditionsContact PublisherSubscribeMagazine SubscriptionPharmaVOICE 100 CelebrationHomeView Digital EditionMagazineNewsBlogCase StudieseBooksPodcastsWebinarsWhite PapersVideosAdvertiseSubscribe  Felix Theeuwes — Durect Results$30.00Copyright: This PDF purchase is for a Single user for review or filing purposes only. The PDF is watermarked. If you are interested in a PDF reprint to post on your website or distribute electronically, or hard-copy reprints, please contact Marah Walsh at mwalsh@pharmavoice.com. Add to cart SKU: 1870. Categories: Drug Discovery, Information Technology. DescriptionProduct DescriptionThere are certain character traits that all good scientists have — vision, patience, and a methodical dedication to the principles and theories that surround discovery. For a scientist in the pharmaceutical field, those core values and abilities become even more critical if the goal of taking a discovery to the market is to be realized. “Scientists need to have the ability to forecast certain outcomes,” says Felix Theeuwes, D.Sc., chairman and chief scientific officer of Durect. “Practicing science means being able to predict the future. As a scientist in the drug-discovery business, it is important that I combine knowledge with foresight to ensure that the company is working toward an outcome that is realistic, that is timely…Sidebar: Making a Durect Connection Theory and Practice: A Journey in Science Durect Product PipelineExpert on this topic Dr. Felix Theeuwes, as Chairman and Chief Scientific Officer of DurectRelated Products Talent Pool $30.00 Add to cart Talent Pool $30.00 Add to cart Introduction $30.00 Add to cart Innovation $30.00 Add to cart    Current Issue  June 2017  Digital Edition  Extra Copies  Reprints  Subscriptions  SUBSCRIBE FOR FREE ACCESSGet free access to PharmaVOICE magazine,
webinars, white papers, podcasts, videos,
article downloads, tips, and event
discounts delivered to your inbox!           CoverageCurrent IssueNewsBlogResourcesCase StudieseBooksPodcastsWebinarsWhite PapersVideosUser CenterSubscribeAdvertiseAbout UsContact UsSubscribeConnect With UsNewslettersTwitterLinked InFacebookGoogle+HomeAdvertiseBlogContact©  2017 PharmaVOICE All rights reserved. FEEDBACK                                             
 



Felix Theeuwes, Chief Scientific Officer, Durect | Spoke











































LOGIN



REGISTER








Add Company



Add Person



Add Topic




Login






Or



















Home | People | Felix Theeuwes


Advanced Search
FAQ




Javascript is disabled












Bio
EDIT













Felix Theeuwes

Dr Theeuwes, Felix Felix Theeuwes



Chief Scientific Officer, Durect




Cupertino, CA




Find other people named Felix Theeuwes




General Info


Pharmaceuticals



Add Tags— eg, Finance, Business2Business...



Felix Theeuwes, D.Sc. is Chairman, co-founder, and Chief Scientific Officer at DURECT Corporation, established in July of 1998 as a spinout from ALZA Corporation to focus on the development of pharmaceutical systems and products to treat chronic debilitating diseases and enabling biotechnology drugs.
Dr. Theeuwes was with ALZA Corporation from 1970 until June 1999 holding positions directing research, technology development, and product development for a variety of controlled drug delivery systems. His work led to the product introduction of the ALZET?? mini osmotic pump series for animal research, and the OROS?? systems series of products. He directed research in transdermal research and development, initiated the electrotransport/iontophoresis program, and initiated the DUROS?? osmotic implant program. He holds more than 210 U.S. patents covering these systems and published more than 80 articles and book chapters.
In 1980 Dr. Theeuwes was named Inventor of the Year by the Peninsula Patent Law Association. In 1983 he was the recipient of the Award for the Advancement of Industrial Pharmacy. He was the Busse Lecturer at the University of Wisconsin in 1981, and in 1985 the Third Annual Sidney Riegelman Lecturer at the University of California, San Francisco. He is a Fellow of the American Association of Pharmaceutical Scientists. In 1993 he became the first recipient of ALZA Corporation’s Founder’s Award.
Dr. Theeuwes is also a director of Inovio Biomedical Corporation (formerly Genetronics), a medical device company, and DURECT Corporation and was formerly a member of the Scientific Advisory Board at Antigenics.
In 1993 Dr. Theeuwes completed the Stanford Executive Program (SEP). He received his undergraduate and graduate education in physics at the University of Leuven (Louvain), Belgium, with a D.Sc. degree in 1966. From 1966 to 1970 he served as a post-doctoral fellow and visiting research assistant professor in the Department of Chemistry, University of Kansas.
?? 2000-2008 DURECT Corporation
 Last updated: December 18, 2007


Not who you're looking for?
Find other Felix Theeuwes on Spoke




Contact



Telephone



Email



Background Report



Public Records


powered by





Digital Info



www.durect.com



N/A



N/A



N/A



N/A



N/A



N/A









Resume

EDIT
CAREER



Durect

Chief Scientific Officer





EDUCATION

EDIT

Add a Degree— eg, Bachelors in Business Administration








Blogs By Industry Voices


There are currently no Blogs by Industry Voices





Achievements and Recognition
EDIT


Add an achievement and/or recognition— eg, Man of the year, Forbes 2011...





Notable Links

EDIT


The links below are powered by Bing search results. Click edit to customize.





Videos
EDIT


Add a videofrom youtube or vimeo





EXECUTIVES & FEATURED PEOPLE AT Durect








John Gibson

Chief Medical Officer









Su Yum

Principal Engineer









Dennis Fisher

Medical Director









Armand Neukermans

Director









Jean Liu

Senior Vice President









James Brown

Chief Executive Officer









Adam Bell

Patent Counsel









Peter Langecker

Chief Medical Officer
















Created on Jun 06, 2011


by Spoke
 







Edited on Jun 06, 2011


by Spoke
 




PAGE COMPLETION

40%




Career




Summary




Industry




Website/Blog




Add a Video



Add Education



Add 3 Notable Links



Add a Photo



Add 3 Achievements



Add a Social Network



View More


View Less



SHARE THIS PAGE
















Add Page


Add Company
Add Person
Add Topic




Copy this code to embed a widget:



<div id="spoke-root"></div>
<script>(function(d, s, id) {
var js, sjs = d.getElementsByTagName(s)[0];
if (d.getElementById(id)) return;
js = d.createElement(s); js.id = id;
js.src = "//www.spoke.com/assets/widget.js";
sjs.parentNode.insertBefore(js, sjs);
}(document, 'script', 'spoke-widget-js'));</script>
    <div class="spoke-widget" data-host="//www.spoke.com" data-type="person" data-id="3e1429c09e597c100033f455" data-width="404" data-height="230" data-scroll="no" data-frame-border="none"></div>
    <div style="font-size: 9pt;"><a href="http://www.spoke.com/people/felix-theeuwes-3e1429c09e597c100033f455">Felix Theeuwes</a> widget provided by <a href="http://www.spoke.com">Spoke</a></div>




Public Records
Our partner can help you find public records for Felix.


More on









Some of Spoke's Content Providers








Become a Spoke Content Provider
Learn More


Felix Theeuwes — Durect Results - PharmaVOICE  : PharmaVOICE                                        READ. THINK. PARTICIPATE.    SUBSCRIBE | REGISTER | LOG IN XSite Login Username  Password  Lost your password?  Don't have an account?Click here to register for free.Benefits of Registered UsersRegistered user can access and download all content.Have a Question?Email Customer ServiceCall (215)321-8656Proceed as Guest  Download as Guest Guests must provide the below information each time you download content from PharmaVOICE.com.Content will be sent to your inbox. Email *   First Name *    Last Name *   Title *  Company *    Don't have an account?Click here to register.Benefits of Registered Users Registered user can access and
download all content without
inputting information multiple
times for multiple downloadsGet your free subscription to PharmaVOICE MagazineClick one of the links below to pick what type of subscription you'd like.  It's completely free. PharmaVOICE Print and Digital Subscription PharmaVOICE Digital Subscription Only PharmaVOICE Print Subscription OnlyAlready subscribed?Click here to loginHave a Question?Email Customer ServiceCall (215)321-8656Forgot your password?Fill out the form below and we will email you a new one.  All you have to do is check your mail and you will be directed back to PharmaVOICE.com Email or Username  Remember your password?Click here to login.Have a Question?Contact Customer ServiceNewsBlogR&DCommercialOperationsCurrent IssueMagazineCurrent IssueDigital EditionArchivesEditorialAdvertiseCirculationReprintsList RentalsSubscribePharmaVOICE 100PharmaVOICE 100 CelebrationNominateSubmission GuidelinesCurrent 100Red Jacket AwardContact EditorResourcesArticlesCase StudieseBooksPodcastsWebinarsWhite PapersVideosEventsPharmaVOICE 100 CelebrationIndustry EventsWebinarsEditorialEditorial CalendarEditorial ScopePhotography GuidelinesPharmaVOICE 100Innovation IssueContact EditorAdvertisePrint AdvertisingOnline AdvertisingE-mail AdvertisingMarketing SolutionsTerms and ConditionsContact PublisherSubscribeMagazine SubscriptionPharmaVOICE 100 CelebrationHomeView Digital EditionMagazineNewsBlogCase StudieseBooksPodcastsWebinarsWhite PapersVideosAdvertiseSubscribe     PharmaVOICE - July 2002Read More → Download PDF Purchase Issue Reprint Quote Felix Theeuwes — Durect ResultsContributed by: NOTE: The content below contains the first few paragraphs of the printed article and the titles of the sidebars and boxes, if applicable.Results With more than 30 years experience in developing innovative drugdelivery technologies, Dr.Felix Theeuwes as chairman and chief scientific officer of Durect, is directing the startup company with the goal of commercializing pharmaceutical systems that .BY KIM RIBBINKPhotos: Scott Lewis Courtesy: Studioslp.comTHERE ARE CERTAIN CHARAC TER TRAITS THAT ALL GOOD SCIENTISTS HAVE — vision, patience, and a methodical dedication to the principles and theories that surround discovery. For a scientist in the pharmaceutical field, those core values and abilities become even more critical if the goal of taking a discovery to the market is to be realized. “Scientists need to have the ability to forecast certain outcomes,” says Felix Theeuwes, D.Sc., chairman and chief scientific officer of Durect. “Practicing science means being able to predict the future. As a scientist in the drugdiscovery business, it is important that I combine knowledge with foresight to ensure that the company is working toward an out come that is realistic, that is timely, and that is affordable.” Time and time again, Dr. Theeuwes has proven that he has the vision, the knowledge, and the determination to turn theoretical for mulas into triedandtrue products. His suc cesses at Alza Corp., where he began his phar maceutical career, and now at Durect speak for themselves — from the development of the Alzet mini osmotic pump to laying the groundwork for many of Alza’s most enduring drug delivery programs. He is continuing along that focused path at Durect, leading the company in its goal of developing pharmaceu tical systems and products to treat chronic debilitating diseases and enabling biotechnol ogy drugs. For Durect, pharmaceutical systems prod ucts are defining a new industry at the conver gence of the biotechnology, pharmaceutical, and medicaldevice industries. While the pharmaceutical, biotechnology, drugdelivery, and medicaldevice industries have increased overall life expectancy and improved patient quality of life, many chronic debilitating dis eases continue to be inadequately treated with current drugs or medical devices. Because of its strong technological founda tion and the unique pharmaceutical systems approach to delivering a drug in the right amount to the right place at the right time, Durect is positioned to capitalize on the advancements currently being made and address challenging problems in the health care industry. “This flexibility allows us to work with a variety of drug candidates including small molecules, proteins, peptides, or genes,” Dr. Theeuwes says. “I have tried to build an orga nization that is based on good science, on transparency, and on limiting bureaucracy to ensure efficiency.” ANEWBEGINNING In July of 1998 Durect was spun out from Alza Corp., which was founded in 1968 by Dr. Alejandro Zaffaroni, who had the vision that medicine could be improved through delivery technology that would culminate in enabling a precise amount of drug to be delivered to the right site at the right time. Dr. Theeuwes, Tom Schreck, and James Brown, D.V.M., with guidance from Dr. Zaf faroni, founded Durect following the success ful completion of a technology licensing agreement with Alza. Under the license agree ment, Alza granted Durect exclusive, world wide rights, including patents, trade secrets, and knowhow, to develop and commercialize products based on Alza’s Duros technology in the fields of: the delivery of drugs by catheter to the central nervous system to treat selected central nervous disorders, the delivery of drugs by catheter to the middle and inner ear, the delivery of drugs by catheter into the pericar dial sac of the heart, the delivery of selected drugs by catheter into vascular grafts, and the delivery of selected cancer antigens for cancer immunotherapy. Alza successfully developed technologies that facilitated precise and timecontrolled drug delivery, which are now widely used in many pharmaceutical products, including Procardia XL, TransdermNitro, and Nico Derm CQ. In June 2001, a wholly owned Johnson & Johnson subsidiary was merged with and into Alza, which retained its name and survives as a direct, wholly owned sub sidiary of J&J. Dr. Theeuwes joined Dr. Zaffaroni at Alza in 1970 where he remained until June 1999 directing research, technology development, People are inspired by example, so I believe in teaching by example. I like to make sure that the issues that are at hand are objectively discussed and can be debated. I try to instill in people a belief in the work so that they take ownership of their work and feel able to make a contribution. FELIX Theeuwes and product development for a variety of con trolled drugdelivery systems. His work led to the product introduction of the Alzet mini osmotic pump series for animal research, and the Oros systems series of products. He direct ed research in transdermal research and devel opment, initiated the electrotransport/ion tophoresis program, as well as the Duros osmotic implant program. Dr. Theeuwes holds more than 210 U.S. patents covering these systems and has published more than 80 articles and book chapters. There were some difficult years for Alza, including a period where the company faced bankruptcy before being rescued by Ciba Geigy and injected with funding of $43 mil lion. Nevertheless, Dr. Theeuwes foresaw the longterm significance of Alza’s drugdelivery programs. “Even though the company did not do well for a long time and I had many opportunities to go to academia or other places, I stayed because the dream of drug delivery had not been realized,” he says. “Alza’s technologies were the best in the world. I continued to work to develop those into products because I knew someday that these were going to be very important both from a technical and business point of view.” AMERICAN CONNECTION Dr. Theeuwes’ successes at Alza might never have been realized were it not for a let ter from a professor at the University of Kansas and a chance meeting with another highly regarded scientist. While working as a research fellow at CERN in Geneva and completing his doctorate in physics through the University of Leuven in Belgium an opportunity to work in the U.S. presented itself. Richard Bearman, a professor of statistical mechanics at the University of Kansas, wrote to a professor at Leuven, inquiring if he knew of anybody with the experimental capa bility to prove out the theories that he was developing on models to describe ideal fluids. The professor recommended Dr. Theeuwes. The move to the U.S. was, Dr. Theeuwes says, a real eyeopener in the best possible sense. “While in graduate school in Belgium, we had to think ahead because it took a long time for equipment to arrive, and to get anything done,” he says. “So we spent a lot of time working through theoretical problems. When I arrived at the University of Kansas, I made a list of equipment that I wanted to have and presented the list to the director of laborato ries, Jack Rose. He replied, `would you like to have them tomorrow or this afternoon?’ I was totally flabbergasted by that quick turnaround capability.” Dr. Theeuwes spent four years at the Uni versity of Kansas, first as a postdoctoral fel low, then as a visiting assistant professor under Professor Bearman, developing equipment, and measuring the thermodynamic properties of two noble gasses — liquid krypton and xenon — as well as thermal conductivities of saline solutions. Dr. Theeuwes was the first person to mea sure the thermodynamic properties of liquid krypton and xenon. While Dr. Theeuwes describes the work as mental gymnastics having only theoretical, or academic interest, with no link to product outcome, his achievements caught the eye of a prominent scientist. “I had the good fortune to meet Takeru Higuchi, who was as Dr. Bearman said, the best applied thermodynamicist of his generation,” Dr. Theeuwes says. “He was a physical organic chemist who had gone to the field of pharmacy to make the art of pharmacy a science, and he’s called by many the father of physical pharmacy. I met him at a social function in 1970 and dur ing our conversation he said I should join this nascent company called Alza. I told him that I knew nothing about drugs, but he replied that the research was not about drugs, rather it was about thermodynamics.” And so Dr. Theeuwes was persuaded to join Alza’s Institute of Pharmaceutical Chem istry in Lawrence, Kan., under the direction of Mr. Higuchi, who was the founding chair of the Department of Pharmaceutical Chemistry at Kansas University. “At the time I made the switch to the pharmaceutical industry people believed that in academia one did very elegant work on irrelevant problems and that in the pharma industry one did very relevant work but fairly superficially,” he explains. “But I found out that in fact it is possible do very relevant work in a very fundamental way, so that was why I switched.” 54 J u l y / A u g u s t 2 0 0 2 PharmaVOICE As a scientist in the drugdiscovery business, it is important that I combine knowledge with foresight to ensure that the company is working toward an outcome that is realistic, that is timely, and that is affordable. FELIX Theeuwes What attracted him to, and kept him at Alza was the company’s approach to enhancing the value of therapeutic compounds by opti mizing their delivery into and within the body. “Alza was founded with the goal to revolu tionize the business of drug development by using new techniques of drug delivery,” Dr. Theeuwes says. “Alza founder Dr. Zaffaroni and Tak Higuchi both envisioned that what was needed was to find a fresh approach to drug development. Alex gave us the mission of where to go, and Tak really set out the method to achieve it.” Alza’s goals were firmly rooted in science, and what Dr. Theeuwes brought to the table was a deep understanding of theory, combined with a dedication to the discipline of science, which had been drummed into him during his schooling and university years in Europe. “I had the good fortune of having terrific high school teachers in math and science,” he says. “They taught us the beauty of mathe matical solutions and the elegance of science — and how the world hangs together. “In Europe at that time, a lot of emphasis was placed on theoretical aspects and on the finer and deeper understanding of how the world works, and how different subjects corre lated and interrelated,” Dr. Theeuwes says. “Computers were not readily available, so in science and mathematics the focus was on forming elegant analytical solutions to prob lems that could then be used to try to predict future events.” In addition, Dr. Theeuwes spent several years early in his career teaching physics, mathematics, chemistry, and biology to high school students in Belgium. That experience, he says, helped ground his understanding of the subjects and how to put that knowledge into practice. “They say in order to know a subject one must see one, do one, teach one,” he says. “Teaching helped me understand how to con vey the message and offer explanations by building a correlation rather than just offering anecdotal information. Building a correlation to previous materials helps not only in the teaching process, but also in research and development.” Dr. Theeuwes credits his parents with instilling in him a thirst for knowledge, the determination to succeed, and an understand ing that he would need to work to overcome obstacles. “My parents lived through two world wars, and people who have lived through those experiences are tempted to give their children a dose of reality and conservatism,” he says. “My mother was very supportive, and believed that her children could achieve anything we put our minds to. And my father was the sort of person who believed it was important to do something relevant, something that would make a difference. They also believed very strongly in education as a way to further our prospects.” A LEGACY OF ACHIEVEMENT Dr. Theeuwes’ findings have attracted attention, earning him several awards and dis tinctions for his scientific achievements. He is particularly proud of two of these honors. “I was the Inventor of the Year in Silicon Valley in 1980, and that’s obviously a presti gious award in an area where so much relevant and so much important work is being done,” he says. “That award was for the establishment of osmotic therapeutic systems technology at Alza. The second award that I am proud of is the Founders Award I received from Alza, which was put in place to emphasize the suc cesses of the company’s technology and prod ucts. I received the first of those awards in recognition for the contribution I made to the company’s scientific foundations.” Dr. Theeuwes’ achievements at Alza have 56 J u l y / A u g u s t 2 0 0 2 PharmaVOICE WHAT LEDTOTHE FORMATION OF DURECT? In the late 1980s, the Alza management team collectively decided that we were going to be commercially more important and success ful if we were to develop our own products. We had set up partner ships, or balancesheet financing mechanisms, including TDC (Thera peutic Discovery Corp.) and Crescendo, to fund the work for about $750 million. This meant that we could not afford to spend extra money for research. In the meantime, I had hired Jim Brown from Syn tex to lead the development of the Duros system, which led to the commercialization of the first product calledViadur (leuprolide acetate implant) to treat the symptoms of advanced prostate cancer. (Viadur is marketed by Bayer Corp.) We met up with Tom Schreck, who eventually became Durect’s third cofounder, and we talked about applications of sitespecific drugdelivery using the Duros technology.We tried to get these things done in Alza and to become an entrepreneurial activity,but we could n’t do it from within since the stock value and the value of the com Making a Durect Connection IN AN EXCLUSIVE INTERVIEWWITH PHARMAVOICE,FELIXTHEEUWES, D.SC.,CHAIRMANANDCHIEFSCIENTIFICOFFICERATDURECT,DISCUSSES THEALZA SPIN OFF’S BEGINNINGS, ITS GOALS,AND ITS PIPELINE. DR.FELIX THEEUWES pany would have been too depressed. So we had to find new monies and new investors and create new ownership,and we then reached an agreement with Alza to spin out these discoveries, and we founded Durect. WHAT IS INTHEPIPELINE AT DURECT? We started out with a license from Alza for the Duros technology, which is a miniature drugdispensing pump that releases minute quan FELIX Theeuwes been numerous and have contributed greatly to the company’s success. “I started at Alza in 1970 when the com pany was a bag of money and a good idea, but there was no technology, and I set out to develop osmotic systems,” he explains. “I invented and developed the Alzet mini osmot ic pump, the elementary osmotic pump, and the pushpull system technologies, which are the basis for the oral drug delivery business of Alza. That was my most important contribu tion to the company.” Among the scientist’s other achievements were initiating the program to develop the Duros system — a miniature drugdispensing pump that releases minute quantities of con centrated drug formulations in a consistent flow over months or years using an osmotic engine, which was the starting point for Durect. LASTING IMPRESSIONS Having spent more than 30 years at Alza, and now at the spinoff company Durect, Dr. Theeuwes understandably has had quite an impact on the way the companies conduct and organize business. “As a manager, I see an organization as a pipeline through which work flows, and I like to build a pipeline that works, that has a min imal number of obstacles, that is simple, that is transparent,” he says. Part of ensuring that those goals are achieved is to create a work environment in which every one is able to make a contribution and has an opportunity to succeed. To encourage others to reach their potential, Dr. Theeuwes tries to set an example with his own work ethics. “People are inspired by example, so I believe in teaching by example,” he says. “I like to make sure that the issues that are at hand are objectively discussed and can be debated. I try to instill in people a belief in the work so that they take ownership of their work and feel able to make a contribution.” Many of the lessons Dr. Theeuwes is now passing onto young scientists and others at the company are those he learned from his men tors — his parents, Mr. Higuchi, Professor Bearman, and others. “I have tried to learn from all my mentors, and to pass on the con cepts and habits I learned from them,” he says. “I try to steer people in the right direction, to correct habits, because in the long run habits that people have and the discipline that they bring to their job are extremely important.” CYCLE OFDISCOVERY “Our goal is to develop pharmaceutical sys tems that have the potential to be a more con venient, patientfriendly product that may provide an alternative to current therapies for longterm treatment of various chronic condi tions,” Dr. Theeuwes says. “The distinct advantage to the patient and the physician is convenience and control, respectively. The patient receives a continuous dose and does not have to worry about taking pills, receiving injections, or changing patches. The physician has the added assurance that the patient is get ting the right dose of medicine and does not have to worry about the possibility of a lost prescription or noncompliance.” For a person to inspire others they need to be inspired themselves, and Dr. Theeuwes finds plenty to be excited about with regard to the possibilities of drugdevelopment technology. He believes there is nothing more fulfilling than taking a drug from an intention to the marketplace, and to witness the contributions to patient wellbeing. He offers a couple of examples of how research at Alza has had an 57 PharmaVOICE J u l y / Au g u s t 2 0 02 tities of concentrated drug formulations in a continuous,consistent flow over months or years using an osmotic engine. We have built that up also to include Duros delivery to sitespecific areas with a catheter attachment. Our most advanced product in that series is the Chrono gesic Pain Therapy System, which combines the Duros technology with a proprietary formulation of sufentanil,a potent opioid currently used in hospitals as an anesthetic. The system, which delivers sufentanil over a threemonth period, is entering Phase III in the middle of this year. We also added technologies from a company called Southern Biosystems Inc., which we acquired in 2001. With that acquisition, Durect gained broad capabilities with three platform technologies: Saber erodable depot injectables, Durin erodable implant technology, and Microdur injectable microcapsule technology. (See related box on pages 60 and 61 for more details.) WHATARE DURECT’S LONGTERM GOALS? We founded Durect with the focus on the highend added value of drug delivery, which is to help treat chronic debilitating diseases. If all medicine in the U.S. was given away free of charge, the savings in healthcare costs would be less than 10%, since the majority of health care costs reside with longterm hospital care and in geriatric institu tions. Furthermore, people suffering from debilitating conditions have a poor quality of life. Our aim at Durect is to combine devices with drugs to create phar maceutical systems that are ambulatory. In other words, patients can walk away with the product and lead a normal, independent life. Not only does that give the patient a high quality of life, it also saves a lot of the cost to society. In addition,we are focusing onenabling biotechnology molecules to reach the marketplace, because many of those will only be laboratory curiosities unless they can be developed to target the part of the body where they are required and at dosage levels where they can have an impact. WHATROLE DOYOU EXPECTTO PLAY IN ADVANCINGTHESETECH NOLOGIES? Firstly, my goal is to define the mission as well as the technical approach of the company.Through experience, I have seen many dead ends, so I am working to keep people away from areas where there are potential failures. That’s where experience pays off. As the chairman of the company, I am focused on the strategy, the objectives, and amwork ing with the board’s input to make this a successful company. Dr.Theeuwes was the Inventor of theYear in Silicon Valley in 1980, which he calls a prestigious award in an area where so much relevant and important work is being done. FELIX Theeuwes impact both on people’s lives and on bottom line results. “While doing research with Pfizer, we started working with nifedipine (Procardia XL), which at the time was used only for the treatment of angina,” he says. “We developed that product as a treatment for both angina and hypertension and by doing so we expand ed the market for that substance from $200 million to $1.4 billion. We also expanded the benefits of the product, by allowing people to take the medicine once a day.” While at Alza, Dr. Theeuwes was instru mental in developing several other proprietary drugdelivery technologies that expanded the use of established compounds, such as fen tanyl, which is marketed as Duragesic by Janssen Pharmaceutica, a J&J company. Dura gesic is a transdermal patch system approved for treating chronic pain. “When we began our research, there was a product called fentanyl, which was a hospital room anesthetic only used in a very controlled setting by an anesthesiologist, and which gen erated about $35 million a year,” Dr. Theeuwes explains. “By developing fentanyl as a transdermal patch that allowed a patient to be mobile and painfree for three days at a time, it became an $800 million product.” Dr. Theeuwes and his team at Durect are expanding on this technology with the Chronogesic Pain Therapy System, which incorporates sufentanil, an opioid that is cur rently used in hospitals as an analgesic. “We are taking sufentanil, which is a hos pitalroom anesthetic that is 7.5 times more potent than fentanyl, and transforming it into a very safe medication that people can use as a treatment for chronic pain,” he says. FUTURE OPPORTUNITIES It is not only work being conducted at Alza and Durect that captures Dr. Theeuwes’ imag ination, but the expansion of the therapy pos sibilities stemming from biotechnology and gene therapy. “In pharma, there have been great contri butions in the antiviral area, the treatment of AIDS,” he enthuses. “We also see new devel opments of vaccines, which are essentially curative and have an enormous impact on the cost of care since they prevent disease from happening. In the biotechnology area it is the development of monoclonal antibodies, which are disease modifying, as opposed to the pal liative treatments that pharma has in the past spent most of its time developing. We also are seeing gene therapy come of age.” Furthermore, the device industry is start ing to play an enormous role, he says. “The contribution that stents have made to the car diovascular field rivals, or even surpasses, that of drug treatment in many ways,” he says. “The combination of drug substances coming from biotech and pharma with the device capability — which is the pharmaceutical sys tems business that Durect is pioneering — allows the industry to build new dimensions in treatment that will have an enormous impact on people’s lives and on healthcare.” Furthering its mission, in April 2001, Durect acquired Southern BioSystems Inc., a privately held company located in Birming ham, Ala. SBS develops, manufactures, and sells biodegradable polymer and nonpolymer drugdelivery systems. SBS also provides bulk supply of biodegradable polymer for seven FDA approved products sold by five cus tomers. As part of this acquisition, Durect acquired intellectual property, including three issued 58 J u l y / A u g u s t 2 0 0 2 PharmaVOICE JULY 1998 TO PRESENT. Chairman, chief scientific officer, and cofounder, Durect Corp. Durect was established in 1998 as a spin off from Alza Corp.to focus on the development of pharmaceutical systems and products to treat chronic debilitating diseases and enabling biotechnology drugs. AUGUST 1998TO JULY 1999.Chief scientist, Alza Corp., Palo Alto, Calif. AUGUST 1997TOAUGUST 1998.President,new ventures and chief scientist, Alza. 1995TOAUG 1997.President, Alza R&D and chief scientist, Alza. 1994TO 1995. President,Alza Technology Institute and chief scientist, Alza. 1991TO 1994. Executive VP, R&D,and chief scientist, Alza. 1987TO 1991.Senior VP, research, and chief scientist, Alza. 1982TO 1987.VP, research, and chief scientist, Alza. 1980TO 1982.VP, product research and development,Alza. 1974TO 1980.Principal scientist, Alza. 1971TO 1974.Research scientist, Alza. 1970 TO 1971. Research scientist, Alza Institute of Pharmaceutical Chemistry, Lawrence, Kan. 1968TO 1970.Visiting assistant professor of chemistry,The University of Kansas. 1966TO 1968. Postdoctoral, Department of Chemistry,The University of Kansas. 1964TO 1966.Research Fellow at CERN, Geneva,Switzerland. 1961 TO 1964. Research Fellow, National Fonds, Belgium high school teacher of physics, mathematics, chemistry, biology,at St.Vincent,Westerlo, Belgium. EDUCATION: 1961.Licentiaat,Physics,The University of Leuven (Louvain),Belgium. 1962.Agregaat Hoger Secundair Onderwijs. 1966. D.Sc., Physics,The University of Leuven (Louvain), Belgium. 1993.Stanford Executive Program. MILITARY SERVICE: 19641965. Lieutenant,Meteorological Service, Belgian Air Force. HONORS: 1966.D.Sc.with Great Distinction. 1980. Inventor of the Year, Peninsula Patent Law Association, for invention and continued development of Osmotic Therapeutic Systems. 1981. Louis W.Busse Lecturer, University of Wisconsin, Madison,Wisc. 1983. Award for the Advancement of Industrial Pharmacy presented by the Academy of Pharmaceutical Sciences. 1985.Third Annual Sidney Riegelman Lecturer, University of California, San Francisco. 1988.Fellow of the American Association of Pharmaceutical Scientists. 1993.First recipient of Alza Corp.’s Founder’s Award. Theory and Practice: A Journey in Science FELIX THEEUWES — RESUME oral, parenteral, dermal, or other routes of administration. Durin technology is drugloaded implants that can be used for delivering an active com pound through parenteral and other routes of administration. Drugdelivery implants consist of an active and a polymeric excipient that are formed into a fiber, rod, film, or other shapes to control drug release through a number of variables. All these developments will change the way that medicine is practiced and will improve quality of life for patients, Dr. Theeuwes contends. “New treatments will go from palliative to restorative and curative,” he says. “Patients will gain more freedom, and doctors will FELIX Theeuwes U.S. patents, covering SBS’s proprietary drug delivery technologies. SBS has three drug delivery platforms: the Saber delivery system, Microdur (microspheres injectable), and Durin (drugloaded implants). The Saber technology is a patented and ver satile depot technology with a simple manu facturing process. Saber is intended to be injected subcutaneously as a liquid, via a nee dle and syringe, and remains in a highly vis cous liquid form following injection to con form to body shape. Microdur uses microencapsulation, the process of trapping the active agent in a solid polymer shell, which results in a freeflowing powder controlling the rate of drug release through a number of variables. The microspheres can be formulated for become healers, as they’re supposed to be. Much of the medicine we have today can be equated to a wooden leg — it’s a crutch on which you walk every day but it doesn’t restore the body to normalcy. Antibiotics are a class of drug that basically eradicate a pathogen and the patient is essentially cured. But very few other medications can do this. In the future, we will see more curative treat ments.” Nevertheless, Dr. Theeuwes remains realis tic about the obstacles the industry faces. “Regulations and politics often place hur dles in the way of development,” he notes. “In my lifetime in the pharmaceutical industry, I have seen the cost of developing a new medicine increase from $200 million to $800 million. There has been a great increase in the 60 J u l y / A u g u s t 2 0 0 2 PharmaVOICE D urect Corp. is pioneering the development and commercial ization of pharmaceutical systems for the treatment of chronic debilitating diseases and enabling biotechnology based pharmaceutical products. Durect’s goal is to deliver the right drug to the right site in the right amount at the right time. Durect’s pharmaceutical systems combine technology innova tions from the medicaldevice and drugdelivery industries with pro prietary pharmaceutical and biotechnology drug formulations.These capabilities can enable new drug therapies or optimize existing ther apies based on a broad range of compounds, including small molecule pharmaceuticals as well as biotechnology molecules such as proteins, peptides,and genes. The company’s focus is on the treatment of chronic diseases including asthma, cancer,cardiovascular disease, central nervous sys tem disorders, and pain. Durect holds an exclusive license from Alza Corp., a Johnson & Johnson company, to develop and commercialize products in selected fields based on the Duros implant technology. ASTHMA Durect, in April 2002, filed an Investigational New Drug application to investigate the delivery of cromolyn sodium for the treatment of asthma.The IND was filed as part of an ongoing program to develop a product for the treatment of asthma andallergic rhinitis (seasonal aller gies) using one of the company’s proprietary biodegradable drug delivery platforms.Cromolyn sodium,a nonsteroidal antiallergy med ication, is a FDAapproved drug for the management of mildtomoderate persistent asthma and is recommended for early intervention and daily antiinflammatory therapy. BIOTECHNOLOGY Drugs developed out of the biotechnology industry are mainly administered by repeated, frequent injection.The desirability of dosage forms that can reliably administer proteins for long periods of time is readily acknowledged. Durect is researching products using its biodegrad able platform technologies in combination with protein molecules having known efficacy against major diseases with a goal to develop products that require less frequent administration than products available on the market. CARDIOVASCULAR In collaboration with the University of Maastricht in The Netherlands, Durect is working to develop methods for treating ischemic heart disease and other chronic cardiovascular diseases through continuous pericardial delivery. Research in animal models suggests that ischemic heart disease may be treated by continuously delivering an angiogenic factor to spur new blood vessel growth, thereby increasing blood flow, and restoring function to the diseased heart. CENTRALNERVOUS SYSTEM Durect has a collaboration with the Johns Hopkins University, Depart ment of Neurology/Neurosurgery, exploring the feasibility of treating tumors of the brain stem by sitespecific delivery of a chemotherapeutic agent directly to the tumor via a Duros system attached to a catheter.The program is in preclinical development studies in primates.The company is developing its Duros platform technology in combination with various catheter systems for targeted delivery of drugs to treat select CNSdisorders. Durect also is developing bioerodible platform technologies for systemic and targeted delivery of select CNS disorders. PAIN With its lead product, the Chronogesic (sufentanil) Pain Therapy Sys tem,Durect intends to target patients with opioid responsive chronic pain that results from a variety of causes. The Chronogesic product delivers sufentanil continuously within the therapeutic window, at physician pre scribed doses for three months of pain therapy.Sufentanil is anopioid that is currently used in hospitals as an analgesic. The Chronogesic product addresses the potential problems of peaks (too much medication) and Durect Product Pipeline FELIX Theeuwes length of time to develop such medications. The challenge to society will be to strike an optimal balance between regulation and poli cy; between the scientific aspects, and the free dom to develop medicine.” In the meantime, Dr. Theeuwes strives to make his contribution to fulfilling the goals of medicine by helping Durect achieve its mile stones. “Everyday we have to make a difference, so I start by looking at which obstacles are keep ing people back and which new concepts or ideas we should pursue to add to the capabili ties that we have,” he says. “As I stand farther and farther back from the work, my main focus is on the horizon.” Because of its strong technological founda tion and its unique pharmaceutical systems approach to delivering a drug in the right amount to the right place at the right time, Durect is wellpositioned to capitalize on the advancements currently being made and address the challenging problems in the healthcare industry. The completion of the sequencing of the human genome will revolu tionize drug discovery, but Durect believes that delivery technology is required to trans form these molecules emerging from biotech nology into real medicine. F PharmaVoice welcomes comments about this article. Email us at feedback@pharmalinx.com. 61 PharmaVOICE J u l y / Au g u s t 2 0 02 troughs (too little medication) associated with pills and patches. This product will provide an alternative to current therapies for the treatment of chronic pain and may provide for less risk of potential misuse, abuse, and diversion than traditional pills or patches.The ability of the Chrono gesic product to provide controlled dosing will allow physicians to pre scribe and safely administer to patients, a clinically necessary opioid for moderatetosevere chronic pain for three months. In 2001, Durect made significant progress in the development of the Chronogesic product. The company completed a Phase II trial in which patients preferred the Chronogesic product by a twotoone margin ver sus their previous pain medication.Patients notonly reported a reduction in side effects when compared with their previous medications, but also reported improved quality of life, such as improved sleep patterns. In 2001, the company also completed a pilot Phase III study that confirmed its conversion strategy for transitioning patients from other opioid medi cations to the Chronogesic product.Chronogesic’s potential is to improve the quality of life of patients suffering from chronic pain and will be eval uated in pivotal Phase III clinical trials starting in 2002.The primary objec tives are to demonstrate that patients can be safely transitioned from a variety of existing opioids, such as pills and patches, to the Chronogesic product, as well as to demonstrate that Chronogesic provides safe and effective pain relief at least equivalent to the patient’s existing pain thera py.The Chronogesic product uses the Duros drugdelivery technology. LOCALPOSTOPERATIVE PAIN Durect is developing a sustainedrelease formulation of a local anes thetic using its Saber Delivery System for the treatment of postsurgical pain. This analgesic will be injected by the physician at the time of surgery and placed adjacent to the surgical site. By delivering effective amounts of a potent analgesic to the location from which the pain orig inates, local pain control can be achieved with minimal exposure to the remainder of the body,and hence minimal side effects.The company is currently conducting preclinical studies on this product. SPINAL DELIVERY PAIN Infusion of opiates into the spinal fluid has become accepted medical therapy in patients who find highdose oral or transdermal opioids inef fective or who experience side effects that make systemic therapy unac ceptable. Although there are many implantable infusion pumps on the market today, these pumps tend to be relatively large and require a cost ly surgical procedure to implant. A need exists for a minimally invasive, spinal infusion device that has an improved cost benefit for patients with chronic pain. Durect’s strategy is to develop an infusion system that can deliver an opioid into the spinal fluid via a catheter. This product will be considerably smaller and less invasive than currently available spinal infu sion pumps, allowing for implantation on an outpatient basis. The com pany is currently conducting preclinical studies on this product. Research Focus:SABER T M Oral Indication: Various Drug:Various Compounds Focus:Biotechnology Indication: Various Drug:Various Agents Focus:Antipsychotic Indication: Psychotic Disorders Drug:AntiPsychotic Agent Preclinical Focus: SABER M Injection Indication: PostOperative Pain Drug:Local Anesthetic Focus: Brain Tumor Local Delivery Indication: Brain Cancer Drug:AntiTumor Agent Focus: Spinal Delivery Indication: Chronic Pain Drug:Opiate Focus: Pericardial Indication: Coronary Disease Drug:Angiogenic Factors Phase I Program Focus: Asthma Indication: Asthma Drug:Cromolyn Phase III Program Product:CHRONOGESIC T M Indication: Chronic Pain Drug:Sufentanil Commercial Products IntrEAR ALZET LACTEL Download PDF •Purchase Issue •Reprint Quote Posted in: Post a Comment Click here to cancel reply.You must be logged in to post a Comment.   Current Issue  June 2017  Digital Edition  Extra Copies  Reprints  Subscriptions  SUBSCRIBE FOR FREE ACCESSGet free access to PharmaVOICE magazine,
webinars, white papers, podcasts, videos,
article downloads, tips, and event
discounts delivered to your inbox!           CoverageCurrent IssueNewsBlogResourcesCase StudieseBooksPodcastsWebinarsWhite PapersVideosUser CenterSubscribeAdvertiseAbout UsContact UsSubscribeConnect With UsNewslettersTwitterLinked InFacebookGoogle+HomeAdvertiseBlogContact©  2017 PharmaVOICE All rights reserved. FEEDBACK                                         



Felix T Theeuwes - Los Altos, CA | Intelius



























Sign In



We found Felix T Theeuwes in Los Altos, CA


Felix T Theeuwes

                                                                           Intelius found that Felix T Theeuwes  is  a male between 80 and 80 years old from Los Altos, CA.  We have connected them to
                7 addresses,
                5 phones,
                and 4 relatives or associates.
         






Get Report Now

Age

Felix T Theeuwes is in his 80s

Felix Has Lived In

Los Altos, CA
Palo Alto, CA
Cupertino, CA

Felix's Relatives

Marc Theeuwes
Myriam Theeuwes
Margaret Theeuwes
Marie-Therese Theeuwes







Felix T Theeuwes



Zodiac SignTaurus



GenderMale



Professional Status
Chairman and Chief Scientific Officer at Durect Corporation



Get Report Now










Want to know more about Felix? Get a comprehensive background report, find full phone numbers, and other contact information when available, all from billions of available public records.
            Continue below for more details about Felix, or use our people search engine to find others.
Get Background Check on Felix T Theeuwes
Get a Criminal Check on Felix T Theeuwes
Get a Public Record Report on Felix T Theeuwes
Get a People Search Report on Felix T Theeuwes


Felix T Theeuwes's Contact Information
Known Cities Lived In
Find out where Felix T Theeuwes has lived as well as Felix T Theeuwes's phone numbers and email addresses.




Felix T Theeuwes Has Lived in 1 States
California Address for Felix T Theeuwes


273050 A******* C** 

Los Altos, CA


Has Lived In

Los Altos, CA
Palo Alto, CA


Get Full Address Report










Phone Numbers Associated with Felix T Theeuwes

(650) ***-**** - Los Altos, CA 
(408) ***-**** - Cupertino, CA 
(858) ***-**** - San Diego, CA 


Get Full Phone Report



Email Addresses Associated with Felix T Theeuwes

f************s@***.com
f****t@***.com
f*******s@***.com


Get Email Report




Felix T Theeuwes's Education Information
Known Schools Attended
Learn about Felix T Theeuwes's academic history.  Find out which schools Felix T Theeuwes attended, the dates attended as well as the degrees Felix T Theeuwes received.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Felix T Theeuwes Has Attended 2 Schools
Stanford University Graduate School of Business 1993 – 1993               Felix T Theeuwes has a Sep 93 in Business               
Stanford University Graduate School of Business               1993 – 1993               Felix T Theeuwes has a Sep 93, Business in Business               


Felix T Theeuwes's Professional Information
Information regarding Felix T Theeuwes's professional history.  Find out previous places Felix T Theeuwes has worked as well as dates employed.
            The following data is not guaranteed for accuracy and should not be used for employment, insurance, credit eligibility, or for any other purpose covered under the Fair Credit Reporting Act.


Felix T Theeuwes Has Worked at 7 Places
Company: Durect Corporation
               Title: Chairman and Chief Scientific Officer
Company: Durect Corporation
               Title: Chief Scientific Officer
Felix T Theeuwes's Experience
Title: Chairman and Chief Scientific Officer
               Company: Durect Corporation
Job Details
               DURECT is a biopharmaceutical company focused on two areas of active drug development: new therapeutics based on its proprietary drug delivery platforms and new chemical entities derived from its Epigenomic Regulator Program. DURECT's current focus is on pain management, CNS disorders, acute organ injury, and metabolic diseases such as NAFLD/NASH. Late stage development programs utilizing DURECT's drug delivery technologies include POSIMIR (SABER-Bupivacaine) and REMOXY ER (oxycodone) extended-release capsules CII. DURECT's Epigenomic Regulator Program includes the lead molecule DUR-928 in Phase 1 development. DUR-928 is an endogenous small molecule that modulates lipid homeostasis, inflammation and cell survival.
Title: Chief Scientific Officer
               Company: Durect Corporation
Job Details
               Company Size: $10 mil to less than $25 mil - Employee Range: 100 to less than 500
Additional Professional Information on Felix T Theeuwes

 See Felix T Theeuwes's LinkedIn Profile



Felix T Theeuwes's Social Network and Potential Email Matches
Find out potential social network profiles and potential email usernamed for Felix T Theeuwes


Felix T Theeuwes's known Social Networks And Potential Email Matches

Find all of Felix T Theeuwes's Social Network Profiles

Get Full Report

Search Social Networks
Including Facebook, LinkedIn, MySpace, Google, Twitter, Yahoo, Jigsaw, ZoomInfo and more



Potential Email Matches
Felix Theeuwes
Username Matches

                  FelixTheeuwes
                  TheeuwesFelix
                  Felix.Theeuwes
                  Theeuwes.Felix
                  Felix_Theeuwes
                  Theeuwes_Felix
                  Felix-Theeuwes
                  Theeuwes-Felix
                  FTheeuwes
               


Popular Email Services

@gmail.com
@aol.com
@yahoo.com
@comcast.net
@hotmail.com
@msn.com
@rocketmail.com
@att.net
@sbcglobal.net
@ymail.com
@facebook.com
@mail.com
@bellsouth.net
@live.com
@earthlink.net
@cox.net
@prodigy.net
@me.com
@peoplepc.com
@juno.com
@rediffmail.com
@mindspring.com
@comcast.com
@charter.net
@outlook.com




All trademarks, product names, company names or logos on this page are the property of their respective owners.
Related People Searches
F Theeuwes







         Intelius is a leading provider of public data about people and their connections to others. Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the Fair Credit Reporting Act (FCRA). This site should not be used to determine an individual’s eligibility for credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose covered by the FCRA. For employment or tenant screening services, please visit our partner Talentwise.
      

About Us
Site Map
About Our Reports
Blog
Help
Contact Us

© 2003 – 2017 PeopleConnect, Inc. d/b/a Intelius. All Rights Reserved.
         Privacy Policy - UPDATED
Terms of Service - UPDATED






What is the FCRA?
The Fair Credit Reporting Act ("FCRA") is a federal law that promotes the accuracy, fairness and privacy of information in the files of consumer reporting agencies.
Intelius does not provide consumer reports and is not a consumer reporting agency as defined by the FCRA. Intelius reports cannot be used for background checks related to consumer credit, insurance, employment, housing or any other purpose
                  prohibited under the FCRA.
You may not use any information obtained from Intelius for any purpose covered by the FCRA.
Find out more about the FCRA here.














Felix Theeuwes Inventions, Patents and Patent Applications - Justia Patents Search

































































Log In
Sign Up











Find a Lawyer
Ask a Lawyer 
Research the Law
Law Schools
Laws & Regs
Newsletters
Legal Marketing












                                    Patents by Inventor Felix Theeuwes
                                




                    Felix Theeuwes has filed for patents to protect the following inventions. This listing includes patent applications that are pending as well as patents that have already been granted by the United States Patent and Trademark Office (USPTO).
                







RADIATION-STERILIZED BIODEGRADABLE DRUG DELIVERY COMPOSITIONS



Publication number:  20170196989
                                            

Abstract:  The present disclosure is directed to a method of making a composition by combining a vehicle, e.g., a single phase vehicle, and an insoluble component comprising a beneficial agent, and sterilizing the composition using ionizing radiation prior to use, wherein the beneficial agent is stable following exposure to a sterilizing dose of ionizing radiation. Related compositions and methods are provided.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        December 19, 2016
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        July 13, 2017
                        

Applicant: 
                                                                        Durect Corporation
                                

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Michael Sekar, Su Il Yum, Felix Theeuwes, William W. van Osdol
                            





Biodegradable Drug Delivery Composition



Publication number:  20170189547
                                            

Abstract:  The present disclosure provides a biodegradable drug delivery composition including a vehicle and an insoluble component comprising beneficial agent dispersed in the vehicle. Typically, the composition is not an emulsion, but has a low viscosity and further provides for minimized initial burst and sustained release of the beneficial agent over time. Also provided, are kits including the biodegradable drug delivery composition or components thereof, as well as methods of making and using the biodegradable drug delivery composition.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        November 18, 2016
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        July 6, 2017
                        

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                William W. van Osdol, Su Il Yum, Felix Theeuwes, Michael Sekar, John W. Gibson, Keith E. Branham, Huey-Ching Su
                            





USES OF OXYGENATED CHOLESTEROL SULFATES (OCS)



Publication number:  20170014429
                                            

Abstract:  Methods of preventing and/or treating ischemia, organ dysfunction and/or organ failure, including multiple organ dysfunction syndrome (MODS), and necrosis and apoptosis associated with organ dysfunction/failure, are provided. For instance, the methods involve contacting organ(s) with an oxygenated cholesterol sulfate (OCS), e.g. 5-cholesten-3,25-diol, 3-sulfate (25HC3S). The organ(s) may be in vivo (e.g. in a patient that is treated with the OCS) or ex vivo (e.g. an organ that has been harvested from a donor and is to be transplanted).
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        December 23, 2014
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        January 19, 2017
                        

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Shunlin REN, Felix THEEUWES, James E. BROWN, WeiQi LIN
                            





Pharmaceutically Active Agent Complexes, Polymer Complexes, and Compositions and Methods Involving the Same



Publication number:  20160303242
                                            

Abstract:  The present disclosure generally provides complexes including a pharmaceutically active agent and a functionalized polymer, wherein the functionalized polymer includes repeat units, the repeat units including ionizable repeat units having at least one ionizable side group and/or ionizable end group, a plurality of the at least one ionizable groups forming non-covalent bonds with the pharmaceutically active agent. Polymers which may be used to form such complexes as well as methods of making and using the complexes and related compositions are also provided.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        December 8, 2014
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        October 20, 2016
                        

Applicant: 
                                                                        Durect Corporation
                                

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Michael Sekar, Felix Theeuwes, Keith E Branham, John W Gibson, James Matriano, Whitney Moro, John Tipton, William Van Osdol, Su Il Yum
                            





DEPOT FORMULATIONS



Publication number:  20160279131
                                            

Abstract:  Disclosed are formulations and related methods that comprise a non-polymeric, non-water soluble high viscosity liquid carrier material having a viscosity of at least 5,000 cP at 37° C. that does not crystallize neat under ambient or physiological conditions; a specified linear polymer comprising lactide repeat units; and one or more solvents that have a solvent capacity.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        February 26, 2016
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        September 29, 2016
                        

Applicant: 
                                                                        DURECT CORPORATION
                                

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Jeremy C. WRIGHT, Felix THEEUWES, John W. GIBSON, Keith E. BRANHAM, Stefania SJOBECK
                            





DEPOT FORMULATIONS



Publication number:  20160045601
                                            

Abstract:  Disclosed are formulations and related methods that comprise a non-polymeric, non-water soluble high viscosity liquid carrier material having a viscosity of at least 5,000 cP at 37° C. that does not crystallize neat under ambient or physiological conditions; a specified linear polymer comprising lactide repeat units; and one or more solvents that have a solvent capacity.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        July 16, 2015
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        February 18, 2016
                        

Applicant: 
                                                                        DURECT CORPORATION
                                

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Jeremy C. WRIGHT, Felix Theeuwes, John W. GIBSON, Keith E. BRANHAM, Stefania SJOBECK
                            





TRANSDERMAL DELIVERY SYSTEMS



Publication number:  20150250738
                                            

Abstract:  Transdermal delivery systems for administering sufentanil through the skin are provided. The systems contain a sufficient amount of sufentanil to induce and maintain a constant state of analgesia when applied to a subject. The systems are characterized as having one or more features including a high degree of dosage form rate control over flux of sufentanil from the system, a high net flux of sufentanil from the system through the skin, lack of a permeation enhancer, an adhesive member demonstrating superior shear time, a low coefficient of variation in the net flux of sufentanil from the system, a high delivery efficiency, and a substantially constant steady state net flux of sufentanil from the system. Methods of using the transdermal delivery systems to administer a sufficient amount of sufentanil to induce and maintain analgesia for extended periods when applied to a subject are also provided.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        March 13, 2015
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        September 10, 2015
                        

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Su Il Yum, Felix Theeuwes
                            





Radiation-Sterilized Biodegradable Drug Delivery Composition



Publication number:  20140294977
                                            

Abstract:  The present disclosure is directed to a method of making a composition by combining a vehicle, e.g., a single phase vehicle, and an insoluble component comprising a beneficial agent, and sterilizing the composition using ionizing radiation prior to use, wherein the beneficial agent is stable following exposure to a sterilizing dose of ionizing radiation. Related compositions and methods are provided.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        November 21, 2012
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        October 2, 2014
                        

Applicant: 
                                                                        DURECT CORPORATION
                                

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Michael Sekar, Su Il Yum, Felix Theeuwes, William van Osdol
                            





Biodegradable Drug Delivery Composition



Publication number:  20140193365
                                            

Abstract:  The present disclosure provides a biodegradable drug delivery composition including a vehicle and an insoluble component comprising beneficial agent dispersed in the vehicle. Typically, the composition is not an emulsion, but has a low viscosity and further provides for minimized initial burst and sustained release of the beneficial agent over time. Also provided, are kits including the biodegradable drug delivery composition or components thereof, as well as methods of making and using the biodegradable drug delivery composition.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        December 10, 2013
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        July 10, 2014
                        

Applicant: 
                                                                        Durect Corporation
                                

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                William W. van Osdol, Su Il Yum, Felix Theeuwes, Michael Sekar, John W. Gibson, Keith E. Branham, Huey-Ching Su
                            





Transdermal Delivery Systems



Publication number:  20140080870
                                            

Abstract:  Transdermal delivery systems for administering sufentanil through the skin are provided. The systems contain a sufficient amount of sufentanil to induce and maintain a constant state of analgesia when applied to a subject. The systems are characterized as having one or more features including a high degree of dosage form rate control over flux of sufentanil from the system, a high net flux of sufentanil from the system through the skin, lack of a permeation enhancer, an adhesive member demonstrating superior shear time, a low coefficient of variation in the net flux of sufentanil from the system, a high delivery efficiency, and a substantially constant steady state net flux of sufentanil from the system. Methods of using the transdermal delivery systems to administer a sufficient amount of sufentanil to induce and maintain analgesia for extended periods when applied to a subject are also provided.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        March 7, 2013
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        March 20, 2014
                        

Applicant: 
                                                                        DURECT CORPORATION
                                

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Su Il Yum, Felix Theeuwes
                            





Biodegradable Drug Delivery Composition



Publication number:  20130259907
                                            

Abstract:  The present disclosure provides a biodegradable drug delivery composition including a vehicle and an insoluble component comprising beneficial agent dispersed in the vehicle. Typically, the composition is not an emulsion, but has a low viscosity and further provides for minimized initial burst and sustained release of the beneficial agent over time. Also provided, are kits including the biodegradable drug delivery composition or components thereof, as well as methods of making and using the biodegradable drug delivery composition.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        March 7, 2013
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        October 3, 2013
                        

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                William van Osdol, Su Il Yum, Felix Theeuwes, Michael Sekar, John W. Gibson, Keith E. Branham, Huey-Ching Su
                            





Transdermal Delivery Systems for Sufentanil



Publication number:  20130028953
                                            

Abstract:  Transdermal delivery systems for administering sufentanil through the skin are provided. The systems contain a sufficient amount of sufentanil to induce and maintain a constant state of analgesia when applied to a subject. The systems are characterized as having one or more features including a high degree of dosage form rate control over flux of sufentanil from the system, a high net flux of sufentanil from the system through the skin, lack of a permeation enhancer, an adhesive member demonstrating superior shear time, a low coefficient of variation in the net flux of sufentanil from the system, a high delivery efficiency, and a substantially constant steady state net flux of sufentanil from the system. Methods of using the transdermal delivery systems to administer a sufficient amount of sufentanil to induce and maintain analgesia for extended periods when applied to a subject are also provided.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        June 1, 2012
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        January 31, 2013
                        

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Su II Yum, Felix Theeuwes
                            





Implantable Devices and Methods for Treatment of Pain by Delivery of Fentanyl and Fentanyl Congeners



Publication number:  20120239007
                                            

Abstract:  The invention features devices and methods for treatment of pain. The drug delivery device is a drug delivery system adapted for whole implantation in a subject and to provide pain relief by delivery of fentanyl or a fentanyl congener (e.g., sufentanil) over a protracted period of time (e.g., at least 3 days or more than 3 days). The device comprises a housing defining a reservoir that contains a drug formulation, a pump operatively connected to the housing so as to facilitate movement of drug out of the reservoir and out of the device, and a thermal expansion element which defines a flow pathway comprising a thermal expansion channel to accommodate thermal expansion of formulation in the reservoir. The device can further comprise a valve positioned within the flow pathway so as to prevent movement of drug out of the reservoir prior to use.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        January 20, 2012
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        September 20, 2012
                        

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Edward M. Gillis, Barbara J. F. Laidlaw, John Culwell, James A. Filice, Peter Wickman, Andrew J. Poutiatine, John S. Dinka, Randolph M. Johnson, Felix Theeuwes
                            





Biodegradable Drug Delivery Composition



Publication number:  20120225033
                                            

Abstract:  The present disclosure provides a biodegradable drug delivery composition including a vehicle and an insoluble component comprising beneficial agent dispersed in the vehicle. Typically, the composition is not an emulsion, but has a low viscosity and further provides for minimized initial burst and sustained release of the beneficial agent over time. Also provided, are kits including the biodegradable drug delivery composition or components thereof, as well as methods of making and using the biodegradable drug delivery composition.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        November 23, 2011
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        September 6, 2012
                        

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                William W. van Osdol, Su il Yum, Felix Theeuwes, Michael Sekar, John Gibson, Keith Branham, Huey-Ching Su
                            





Transdermal delivery system for sufentanil



Patent number:  8252320
                                            

Abstract:  Transdermal delivery systems for administering sufentanil through the skin are provided. The systems contain a sufficient amount of sufentanil to induce and maintain a constant state of analgesia when applied to a subject. The systems are characterized as having one or more features including a high degree of dosage form rate control over flux of sufentanil from the system, a high net flux of sufentanil from the system through the skin, lack of a permeation enhancer, an adhesive member demonstrating superior shear time, a low coefficient of variation in the net flux of sufentanil from the system, a high delivery efficiency, and a substantially constant steady state net flux of sufentanil from the system. Methods of using the transdermal delivery systems to administer a sufficient amount of sufentanil to induce and maintain analgesia for extended periods when applied to a subject are also provided.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Grant
                                            

Filed: 
                        July 31, 2007
                    

Date of Patent: 
                                                        August 28, 2012
                        

Assignee: 
                                                                        Durect Corporation
                                

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Su Il Yum, Felix Theeuwes
                            





Transdermal delivery system for sufentanil



Patent number:  8252319
                                            

Abstract:  Transdermal delivery systems for administering sufentanil through the skin are provided. The systems contain a sufficient amount of sufentanil to induce and maintain a constant state of analgesia when applied to a subject. The systems are characterized as having one or more features including a high degree of dosage form rate control over flux of sufentanil from the system, a high net flux of sufentanil from the system through the skin, lack of a permeation enhancer, an adhesive member demonstrating superior shear time, a low coefficient of variation in the net flux of sufentanil from the system, a high delivery efficiency, and a substantially constant steady state net flux of sufentanil from the system. Methods of using the transdermal delivery systems to administer a sufficient amount of sufentanil to induce and maintain analgesia for extended periods when applied to a subject are also provided.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Grant
                                            

Filed: 
                        July 31, 2007
                    

Date of Patent: 
                                                        August 28, 2012
                        

Assignee: 
                                                                        Durect Corporation
                                

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Su Il Yum, Felix Theeuwes
                            





Transdermal delivery systems



Patent number:  8246977
                                            

Abstract:  Transdermal delivery systems for administering sufentanil through the skin are provided. The systems contain a sufficient amount of sufentanil to induce and maintain a constant state of analgesia when applied to a subject. The systems are characterized as having one or more features including a high degree of dosage form rate control over flux of sufentanil from the system, a high net flux of sufentanil from the system through the skin, lack of a permeation enhancer, an adhesive member demonstrating superior shear time, a low coefficient of variation in the net flux of sufentanil from the system, a high delivery efficiency, and a substantially constant steady state net flux of sufentanil from the system. Methods of using the transdermal delivery systems to administer a sufficient amount of sufentanil to induce and maintain analgesia for extended periods when applied to a subject are also provided.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Grant
                                            

Filed: 
                        October 21, 2005
                    

Date of Patent: 
                                                        August 21, 2012
                        

Assignee: 
                                                                        Durect Corporation
                                

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Su Il Yum, Felix Theeuwes
                            





Pharmaceutical compositions for administraton to a sinus



Publication number:  20100016267
                                            

Abstract:  Pharmaceutical compositions for delivering a drug to a sinus in a subject are provided. The compositions are formed by the combination of a carrier material and a drug and are specially adapted for delivery to a sinus. The compositions have no fixed shape, and the carrier material serves to increase the viscosity or specific volume of the composition after introduction of the composition into the sinus. Also provided are methods for delivering a drug to a subject. The methods entail administering a pharmaceutical composition according to the present invention directly to a sinus. The drug is then released from the composition to the sinus. The pharmaceutical compositions can be administered to a sinus in liquid form, for example, as a suspension or solution using standard techniques. Also provided is the use of a carrier material in the manufacture of a drug delivery composition. The drug delivery composition is for delivering a drug to a sinus in a subject.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Application
                                            

Filed: 
                        March 15, 2005
                    

Publication date: 
                                                        January 21, 2010
                        

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Felix Theeuwes, Arthur J. Tipton
                            





Electrotransport agent delivery method and apparatus



Patent number:  7572252
                                            

Abstract:  A method of increasing the delivery efficiency of an agent through a body surface by electrotransport is disclosed wherein the electrotransport current is applied for durations at a higher current density values followed by durations of lower current density values wherein the higher current density applications transform the body surface to an enhanced, non-transitory agent delivery efficiency state.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Grant
                                            

Filed: 
                        June 7, 1995
                    

Date of Patent: 
                                                        August 11, 2009
                        

Assignee: 
                                                                        Alza Corporation
                                

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                J. Bradley Phipps, Gary A. Lattin, Ronald P. Haak, Suneel Gupta, Felix Theeuwes
                            





Fluid delivery device having an electrochemical pump with an anionic exchange membrane and associated method



Patent number:  7470267
                                            

Abstract:  A fluid delivery device, comprising an electrochemical pump, wherein the pump is capable of transporting water; a pump product chamber, wherein the pump product chamber is capable of retaining water generated from the pump; a displaceable member positioned between the pump product chamber and a reservoir, wherein the displaceable member is controllably displaced upon generation of water from the electrochemical pump; a reservoir, wherein the reservoir is capable of containing a fluid which is delivered upon displacement of the displaceable member; and an housing for containing the pump, the pump product chamber, the displaceable member, and the reservoir.
                        

Type: 
                                                    Grant
                                            

Filed: 
                        May 1, 2002
                    

Date of Patent: 
                                                        December 30, 2008
                        

Assignee: 
                                                                        Microlin, LLC
                                

Inventors: 
                                                                
                                Ashok V. Joshi, Strahinja K. Zecevic, Sai Bhavaraju, Felix Theeuwes, Jeremy Corwin Wright
                            



 


1

2


3


4


5

…

next







Ask a Lawyer





Question:



Add details
120



Additional Details: 




                                                    1000
                                                



                                            Ask Question
                                        






Find a Lawyer













Lawyers - Get Listed Now!

Get a free directory profile listing










                    Justia Legal Resources
                



Find a Lawyer





Bankruptcy Lawyers
Business Lawyers
Criminal Lawyers
Employment Lawyers
Estate Planning Lawyers
Family Lawyers
Personal Injury Lawyers
More... 




Individuals





Bankruptcy
Criminal
Divorce
DUI
Estate Planning
Family Law
Personal Injury
More...




Business





Business Formation
Business Operations
Employment
Intellectual Property
International Trade
Real Estate
Tax Law
More... 




Law Students





Law Schools
Admissions
Financial Aid
Course Outlines
Law Journals
Blogs
Employment
More...




US Federal Law





US Constitution
US Code
Regulations
Supreme Court
Circuit Courts
District Courts
Dockets & Filings
More...




US State Law





State Constitutions
State Codes
State Case Law
California
Florida
New York
Texas
More... 




Other Databases





Legal Blogs
Legal Forms
GAO Reports
Product Recalls
Patents
Trademarks
Countries
More...




Legal Marketing





Websites
Blogs
Content
Social Media
Local Marketing
Paid Ads (CPC/PPC)
Lawyer Directory
More...












 
                             © 2017 Justia



Company
Terms of Service
Privacy Policy
Help
Marketing Solutions


































































Genetic Engineering & Biotechnology News








                                            GEN Quiz: Evaluate Your Knowledge on Cancer, Obesity, and CRISPR Movies
                                        



                                            Human Neural Stem Cell Therapy for Chronic Ischemic Stroke
                                        



                                            Looking at the CAR-T Landscape as First Approval Nears
                                        



                                            HCV Drug Therapy and the DNA Base Excision Repair System
                                        





                                            Is Calcium the Achilles Heel for Clostridium Infections?
                                        



                                            Literature Review: Organs-On-Chips Marching In
                                        



                                            The Prodrug Opportunity: Making Good Drugs Better
                                        



                                            Cannabidiol Does Not Convert to THC In Vivo












Exclusives
Reducing the Need for Clinical Bioequiva...







                                            GEN Quiz: Evaluate Your Knowledge on Cancer, Obesity, and CRISPR Movies
                                        



                                            Human Neural Stem Cell Therapy for Chronic Ischemic Stroke
                                        



                                            Looking at the CAR-T Landscape as First Approval Nears
                                        



                                            HCV Drug Therapy and the DNA Base Excision Repair System
                                        





                                            Is Calcium the Achilles Heel for Clostridium Infections?
                                        



                                            Literature Review: Organs-On-Chips Marching In
                                        



                                            The Prodrug Opportunity: Making Good Drugs Better
                                        



                                            Cannabidiol Does Not Convert to THC In Vivo












News
Mitsubishi Tanabe to Buy Parkinson's...







                                            High-Fat Diet in Pregnancy Damages Offspring Brain Development and Mental Health
                                        



                                            Immunotherapy’s Ineffectiveness toward Bladder Cancer Uncovered
                                        



                                            Cellectis Granted T Cell CRISPR Patent in Europe
                                        



                                            Merck, Samsung Bioepis Launch Remicade Biosimilar in U.S.
                                        





                                            Team Uses ARGO Methodology to Follow Dengue Outbreaks
                                        



                                            Antibody Factory in a Dish
                                        



                                            Lilly to Co-Develop Nektar Autoimmune Candidate NKTR-358
                                        



                                            Archaic Humans within Spitting Distance, Genetically Speaking
                                        











The Lists
Top 10 U.S. Biopharma Clusters







                                            60 Biotech and Biopharma Recruiters
                                        



                                            10 Takeover Targets for 2017
                                        



                                            The Top 15 Best-Selling Drugs of 2016
                                        



                                            Top Eight Asia Biopharma Clusters 2017
                                        





                                            Top 10 Under 40
                                        



                                            Top 10 Immuno-Oncology Collaborations
                                        



                                            Top 10 European Biopharma Clusters
                                        



                                            25 Clinical Failures of Q1 2017
                                        











Magazine
Gene Therapy: A New Twist on an Old Heli...







                                            Short Stories to Peruse—With Info You Might Use....
                                        



                                            Manufacturing of AAV Vectors for Gene Therapy
                                        



                                            Insights
                                        



                                            Panasonic Launches New Dual-Compressor Freezers
                                        





                                            Advancing 3D Cell Culture for Biomedical Research Using Primary Cells
                                        



                                            GEN Roundup: Top Trends in Tissue Engineering
                                        



                                            Accelerating Novel Therapeutic Discovery
                                        



                                            Optimizing the Delivery of Peptide-Based Therapeutics
                                        



Current Issue » 
Past Issues » 












More GEN


New Products


Best of the Web


Webinars









                                        Polls
                                    



                                        BioPerspectives
                                    



                                        Events
                                    



                                        Subscribe to GEN
                                    





                                        eBooks
                                    



                                        Podcasts
                                    



                                        Video
                                    



                                        Best Apps
                                    





















Subscribe


GEN Select Login/Register







Leading the Way in Life Science Technologies


Facebook


Twitter


LinkedIn


YouTube


Google+


RSS





















 GEN Exclusives
 More »




 
DNA Fab Keeps Getting More Fab
DNA Fabrication Keeps Improving, Thanks to Innovations in Biosensors, DNA Nanoswitches, and Microfluidic Chips


 
Reducing the Need for Clinical Bioequivalence Endpoint Studies
Raman Spectroscopy and MDRS Enable Determination of the Size and Shape of Specific Components Within a Multicomponent Blend


 
HCV Drug Therapy and the DNA Base Excision Repair System
The Influence of New Anti-HCV Therapy on the DNA Base Excision Repair System of Peripheral Blood Mononuclear Cells


 
The Prodrug Opportunity: Making Good Drugs Better
Elegance in Chemistry, Product Development, and Marketability










GEN Contributor


        
        Felix Theeuwes D.Sc.
    






        Felix Theeuwes, D.Sc. is Chairman, co-founder, and Chief Scientific Officer at DURECT Corporation, established in July of 1998 as a spinout from ALZA Corporation to focus on the development of pharmaceutical systems and products to treat chronic debilitating diseases and enabling biotechnology drugs.Dr. Theeuwes was with ALZA Corporation from 1970 until June 1999 holding positions directing research, technology development, and product development for a variety of controlled drug delivery systems. His work led to the product introduction of the ALZET® mini osmotic pump series for animal research, and the OROS® systems series of products. He directed research in transdermal research and development, initiated the electrotransport/iontophoresis program, and initiated the DUROS® osmotic implant program. He holds more than 210 U.S. patents covering these systems and published more than 80 articles and book chapters.
    


        More GEN Content From This Contributor
    


Columns: Drug Delivery Fuels Specialty Pharma


Biopharmaceutical: ADVANCED DRUG DELIVERY STRATEGIES












GEN Quizzes


                   GEN Quiz: Evaluate Your Knowledge on Cancer, Obesity, and CRISPR Movies
                

GEN Quiz: Evaluate Your Knowledge on Parkinson’s, CRISPR, and Crohn’s Disease
GEN Quiz: Evaluate Your Knowledge on Mosquitoes, Olive Oil, and Medicinal Plants
GEN Quiz: Evaluate Your Knowledge on Saliva, the NIH’s Budget, and Shampoo
GEN Quiz: Evaluate Your Knowledge on HIV, CRISPR, and Artificial Sweeteners

More »








 










Be sure to take the GEN Poll

                {{ vm.poll.Title }} 
            









{{ choice.Text}}










                                    {{ choice.Text }}
                                

                                     
                                
                                 
                                {{ choice.Percent }}%
                            


 





Closes in {{vm.timer}}








Vote




Get Results



More »
















Congratulations!


You are now a GEN Select Insider!  You now have access to in-depth reports, peer reviewed papers and hot jobs.














© 2017 Genetic Engineering & Biotechnology News All Rights Reserved


GEN
About GEN
Press Releases
Reprints & Permissions
Contact GEN


GEN EDITORIAL
Editorial Staff
Editorial Guidelines
2017 Planning Calendar


ADVERTISE
GEN Media Kit
Classified Media Kit
Ad Terms & Conditions
GEN List Rental


SUBSCRIPTION CENTER
GEN Magazine
eNewsletters


RESOURCES
App Notes
Biotech Boulevard
Clinical OMICs
New Products
Podcasts



Home |
            Terms of Use |
            Privacy Statement |
            Legal |
            Mary Ann Liebert, Inc.




























DURECT | Board of Directors














 






















 






 







ABOUTABOUT DURECTMANAGEMENTBOARD OF DIRECTORSCORPORATE GOVERNANCEBOARD COMMITTEE CHARTERSCODE OF ETHICSWHISTLEBLOWER POLICYCORPORATE GOVERNANCE GUIDELINESPRODUCTSALZET® Osmotic PumpsLACTEL® Absorbable PolymersPIPELINEOVERVIEWIN DEVELOPMENTDUR-928POSIMIR® (SABER®-Bupivacaine)REMOXY® (ORADUR®-Oxycodone) ER capsulesORADUR®-Hydromorphone and ORADUR®-OxymorphoneORADUR®-MethylphenidateRELDAY® (SABER®-Risperidone)ELADUR® (TRANSDUR®-Bupivacaine)SUSTAINED-RELEASE Ophthalmology ProductSCIENCE & TECHNOLOGIESEPIGENETIC REGULATORSLONG-ACTING INJECTABLESSABER® PLATFORMCLOUD® PLATFORMORADUR® ABUSE-DETERRENT TECHNOLOGYTRANSDUR® TRANSDERMAL TECHNOLOGYPATENTSPUBLICATIONSPOSIMIR® (SABER®-Bupivacaine)EPIGENETIC REGULATOR PROGRAMELADUR® (TRANSDUR®-Bupivacaine)SABER® & CLOUD® Injectable Depot SystemsINVESTORSOVERVIEWSTOCK INFORMATIONNEWS RELEASESCOLLABORATIONSEARNINGS ESTIMATEANALYST COVERAGECORPORATE PRESENTATIONFINANCIAL REPORTSSEC FILINGSEVENT CALENDARFAQsEMAIL ALERTSINFORMATION REQUESTNEWSNEWS RELEASESMEDIA KIT 













ABOUT










ABOUT DURECTMANAGEMENTBOARD OF DIRECTORSCORPORATE GOVERNANCEBOARD COMMITTEE CHARTERSCODE OF ETHICSWHISTLEBLOWER POLICYCORPORATE GOVERNANCE GUIDELINES 








Board of Directors




Felix Theeuwes, D.Sc.
Chairman and Chief Scientific Officer 



Felix Theeuwes, D.Sc. is Chairman, co-founder, and Chief Scientific Officer at DURECT Corporation, established in July of 1998 as a spinout from ALZA Corporation to focus on the development of pharmaceutical systems and products to treat chronic debilitating diseases and enabling biotechnology drugs.
Dr. Theeuwes was with ALZA Corporation from 1970 until June 1999 holding positions directing research, technology development, and product development for a variety of controlled drug delivery systems. His work led to the product introduction of the ALZET mini osmotic pump series for animal research, and the OROS systems series of products. He directed research in transdermal research and development, initiated the electrotransport/iontophoresis program, and initiated the DUROS osmotic implant program. He holds more than 210 U.S. patents covering these systems and published more than 80 articles and book chapters.
In 1980 Dr. Theeuwes was named Inventor of the Year by the Peninsula Patent Law Association. In 1983 he was the recipient of the Award for the Advancement of Industrial Pharmacy. He was the Busse Lecturer at the University of Wisconsin in 1981, and in 1985 the Third Annual Sidney Riegelman Lecturer at the University of California, San Francisco. He is a Fellow of the American Association of Pharmaceutical Scientists. In 1993 he became the first recipient of ALZA Corporation's Founder's Award.
In 1993 Dr. Theeuwes completed the Stanford Executive Program (SEP). He received his undergraduate and graduate education in physics at the University of Leuven (Louvain), Belgium, with a D.Sc. degree in 1966. From 1966 to 1970 he served as a post-doctoral fellow and visiting research assistant professor in the Department of Chemistry, University of Kansas. 





James E. Brown, D.V.M.
President and Chief Executive Officer 



James E. Brown, D.V.M. co-founded DURECT in February 1998 and has served as President, Chief Executive Officer and a Director since June 1998.
He previously worked at ALZA Corporation as Vice President of Biopharmaceutical and Implant Research and Development from June 1995 to June 1998. Prior to that, Dr. Brown held various positions at Syntex Corporation, a pharmaceutical company, including Director of Business Development from May 1994 to May 1995, Director of Joint Ventures for Discovery Research from April 1992 to May 1995, and held a number of positions including Program Director for Syntex Research and Development from October 1985 to March 1992.
Dr. Brown holds a B.A. from San Jose State University and a D.V.M. (Doctor of Veterinary Medicine) from the University of California, Davis where he also conducted post-graduate work in pharmacology and toxicology. 





Simon X. Benito
Director 



Simon X. Benito has served as a director since April 2005. Mr. Benito is currently a director and chairman of the Audit Committee of Inovio Biomedical Corporation, a medical device company. From 1974 to 1999, Mr. Benito held various positions at Merck & Co Inc. including Senior Vice President, Vaccine Division from 1996 to 1999, Executive Vice President, Merck-Medco Managed Care from 1994 to 1996 and Executive Director and Vice President, Merck Human Health, Japan from 1986-1993. Mr. Benito was a Fellow of the Institute of Chartered Accountants in England and Wales from 1969 to 1999 until his retirement from Merck. 





Terrence F. Blaschke, M.D.
Director 



Terrence F. Blaschke, M.D. has served as a director since December 2006. Mr. Blaschke has served on the faculty of Stanford University since 1974 and is Professor of Medicine and Molecular Pharmacology (Active Emeritus) at the Stanford University School of Medicine. Mr. Blaschke held the position of Vice President of Methodology and Science at Pharsight Corporation from 2000 to 2002. During the course of his career, Mr. Blaschke has served as an independent consultant working with a number of leading pharmaceutical and biotechnology companies. Mr. Blaschke was formerly a Board member of Therapeutic Discovery Corporation and Crescendo Pharmaceuticals, two publicly-traded companies. He has also worked as a special government employee for the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) and has served as the chairman of the FDA's Generic Drugs Advisory Committee. 





David R. Hoffmann, Ph.D.
Director, Lead Independent Director 



David R. Hoffmann has served as a Director since December 2002 and as a Lead Independent Director since December 2010. Mr. Hoffmann is retired from ALZA Corporation (now a Johnson & Johnson company) where he held the position of Vice President and Treasurer from 1992 to until his retirement in October 2002, Vice President of Finance from 1982 to 1992 and Director of Accounting/Finance from 1976 to 1982. Mr. Hoffmann is currently Chief Executive Officer of Hoffmann Associates, a multi-group company specializing in cruise travel and financial and benefit consulting, and a consultant of ALZA Corporation. Mr. Hoffmann holds a B.S. in Business Administration from the University of Colorado. Mr. Hoffmann is currently a director and chairman of the Audit Committee of Threshold Pharmaceuticals, a biotechnology company. 





Armand P. Neukermans, Ph.D.
Director 



Armand P. Neukermans, Ph.D. has served as a Director since March 2001. Dr. Neukermans founded Xros, Inc. in December 1996. Xros was acquired by and became a division of Nortel Networks in March 2000. Throughout and until June 2002, Dr. Neukermans has held the position of Chairman and Chief Technical Officer at Xros. In October 1993, Dr. Neukermans founded Adagio Associates, a consulting firm in the area of instrumentation, metrology and microfabrication and currently serves as its President. From 1992 to 1993, Dr. Neukermans was Vice President, Systems Development at Teknekron TSDC. Between 1985 and 1992, Dr. Neukermans held various positions at Tencor Instruments including Vice President and Chief Technical Officer. From 1973 to 1985, Dr. Neukermans held various positions at Hewlett Packard Company, HP Labs, including Department Manager. Dr. Neukermans holds an Engineer’s Degree in Mechanical and Electrical Engineering from Louvain University, an M.S. in Electrical Engineering from Arizona State University and a Ph.D. in Applied Physics from Stanford University. Dr. Neukermans was named Silicon Valley Inventor of the Year in 2001. 





Jon S. Saxe, J.D., L.L.M.
Director 



Jon S. Saxe has served as a Director since September 2003. Mr. Saxe is currently a director of a number of biotechnology and pharmaceutical companies including SciClone, VistaGen and several private companies.
From January 1995 to May 1999, Mr. Saxe was President of Protein Design Labs, a leading company in the development of humanized antibodies. During 1999, he was an Executive-in-Residence at Institutional Venture Partners, a venture capital firm. Mr. Saxe was President of Saxe Associates, a biotechnology and pharmaceutical consulting firm, from May 1993 to December 1994. He served as President, Chief Executive Officer and as a Director of Synergen, Inc., a biopharmaceutical company acquired by Amgen, from October 1989 to April 1993. From August 1984 through September 1989, Mr. Saxe was Vice President, Licensing and Corporate Development at Hoffmann-LaRoche and also head of the patent law department and Associate General Counsel at the company from September 1978 through September 1989. Mr. Saxe received his B.S. in Chemical Engineering from Carnegie-Mellon University, a J.D. from George Washington University School of Law and an LL.M. from New York University School of Law. 









 

















 © 2000-2017 DURECT Corporation


BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT | CAREERS | CONTACT | LEGAL NOTICE | PRIVACY POLICY 























DURECT | Management














 






















 






 







ABOUTABOUT DURECTMANAGEMENTBOARD OF DIRECTORSCORPORATE GOVERNANCEBOARD COMMITTEE CHARTERSCODE OF ETHICSWHISTLEBLOWER POLICYCORPORATE GOVERNANCE GUIDELINESPRODUCTSALZET® Osmotic PumpsLACTEL® Absorbable PolymersPIPELINEOVERVIEWIN DEVELOPMENTDUR-928POSIMIR® (SABER®-Bupivacaine)REMOXY® (ORADUR®-Oxycodone) ER capsulesORADUR®-Hydromorphone and ORADUR®-OxymorphoneORADUR®-MethylphenidateRELDAY® (SABER®-Risperidone)ELADUR® (TRANSDUR®-Bupivacaine)SUSTAINED-RELEASE Ophthalmology ProductSCIENCE & TECHNOLOGIESEPIGENETIC REGULATORSLONG-ACTING INJECTABLESSABER® PLATFORMCLOUD® PLATFORMORADUR® ABUSE-DETERRENT TECHNOLOGYTRANSDUR® TRANSDERMAL TECHNOLOGYPATENTSPUBLICATIONSPOSIMIR® (SABER®-Bupivacaine)EPIGENETIC REGULATOR PROGRAMELADUR® (TRANSDUR®-Bupivacaine)SABER® & CLOUD® Injectable Depot SystemsINVESTORSOVERVIEWSTOCK INFORMATIONNEWS RELEASESCOLLABORATIONSEARNINGS ESTIMATEANALYST COVERAGECORPORATE PRESENTATIONFINANCIAL REPORTSSEC FILINGSEVENT CALENDARFAQsEMAIL ALERTSINFORMATION REQUESTNEWSNEWS RELEASESMEDIA KIT 













ABOUT










ABOUT DURECTMANAGEMENTBOARD OF DIRECTORSCORPORATE GOVERNANCEBOARD COMMITTEE CHARTERSCODE OF ETHICSWHISTLEBLOWER POLICYCORPORATE GOVERNANCE GUIDELINES 








Management




Felix Theeuwes, D.Sc.
Chairman and Chief Scientific Officer 



Felix Theeuwes, D.Sc. is Chairman, co-founder, and Chief Scientific Officer at DURECT Corporation, established in July of 1998 as a spinout from ALZA Corporation to focus on the development of pharmaceutical systems and products to treat chronic debilitating diseases and enabling biotechnology drugs.
Dr. Theeuwes was with ALZA Corporation from 1970 until June 1999 holding positions directing research, technology development, and product development for a variety of controlled drug delivery systems. His work led to the product introduction of the ALZET mini osmotic pump series for animal research, and the OROS systems series of products. He directed research in transdermal research and development, initiated the electrotransport/iontophoresis program, and initiated the DUROS osmotic implant program. He holds more than 210 U.S. patents covering these systems and published more than 80 articles and book chapters.
In 1980 Dr. Theeuwes was named Inventor of the Year by the Peninsula Patent Law Association. In 1983 he was the recipient of the Award for the Advancement of Industrial Pharmacy. He was the Busse Lecturer at the University of Wisconsin in 1981, and in 1985 the Third Annual Sidney Riegelman Lecturer at the University of California, San Francisco. He is a Fellow of the American Association of Pharmaceutical Scientists. In 1993 he became the first recipient of ALZA Corporation's Founder's Award.
In 1993 Dr. Theeuwes completed the Stanford Executive Program (SEP). He received his undergraduate and graduate education in physics at the University of Leuven (Louvain), Belgium, with a D.Sc. degree in 1966. From 1966 to 1970 he served as a post-doctoral fellow and visiting research assistant professor in the Department of Chemistry, University of Kansas. 





James E. Brown, D.V.M.
President and Chief Executive Officer 



James E. Brown, D.V.M. co-founded DURECT in February 1998 and has served as President, Chief Executive Officer and a Director since June 1998.
He previously worked at ALZA Corporation as Vice President of Biopharmaceutical and Implant Research and Development from June 1995 to June 1998. Prior to that, Dr. Brown held various positions at Syntex Corporation, a pharmaceutical company, including Director of Business Development from May 1994 to May 1995, Director of Joint Ventures for Discovery Research from April 1992 to May 1995, and held a number of positions including Program Director for Syntex Research and Development from October 1985 to March 1992.
Dr. Brown holds a B.A. from San Jose State University and a D.V.M. (Doctor of Veterinary Medicine) from the University of California, Davis where he also conducted post-graduate work in pharmacology and toxicology. 





Matthew J. Hogan, M.B.A.
Chief Financial Officer 



Matthew J. Hogan joined DURECT from Ciphergen Biosystems, Inc., where he was the Chief Financial Officer from 2000 to 2006 and a consultant from March 2006. Prior to joining Ciphergen, Mr. Hogan was the Chief Financial Officer at Avocet Medical, Inc. from 1999 to 2000. From 1996 to 1999, Mr. Hogan was the Chief Financial Officer at Microcide Pharmaceuticals, Inc. From 1986 to 1996, he held various positions in the investment banking group at Merrill Lynch & Co., most recently as a Director focusing on the biotechnology and pharmaceutical sectors. Mr. Hogan holds a B.A. in economics from Dartmouth College and an M.B.A. from the Amos Tuck School of Business Administration. 





Su IL Yum, Ph.D.
Executive Vice President, Pharmaceutical Systems R&D and Principal Engineer 



Dr. Yum joined DURECT in 1999. Since then, he has continuously been involved in the application of several of DURECT's platform technologies such as DUROS, SABER and DURIN. Su IL's significant contributions have played a huge role in the development of various parenteral and oral drug delivery systems that are based on these DURECT technologies.
Prior to joining DURECT, Dr. Yum served as Senior Technical Advisor at Amira Medical in Scotts Valley, California, where he participated in the development of a pain-free blood glucose detector called AtLast.
Prior to joining Amira, he held a number of senior positions in project management and engineering at ALZA Corporation ("ALZA"). His contributions at ALZA include the development of a number of ALZA's enabling technologies and commercial products, most notably transdermal patch products such as, Nicoderm nicotin and Duragesic fentanyl systems. Other products include; Travenol Infusor, which ALZA licensed to Baxter, and ALZET osmotic pumps, used for experimental research in laboratory animals. His fundamental insight into mass transport phenomena and product design were instrumental to his success in exploratory research, and development activities at ALZA.
Dr. Yum earned his Ph.D. degree in Chemical Engineering from the University of Minnesota, and completed post-doctoral research in Biomedical Engineering at the University of Utah. He has more than 40 scientific publications and is the holder of more than 60 U.S. and foreign patents. Dr. Yum is a Fellow of the AAPS. 





Michael H. Arenberg, J.D., M.B.A. 
Senior Vice President, Corporate and Business Development 



Michael H. Arenberg leads business development for DURECT Corporation. Since joining DURECT in 1999, Mr. Arenberg has held a variety of positions with increasing responsibilities in general management, sales & marketing and business development where he has been responsible for a number of significant partnering deals. Prior to joining DURECT, Mr. Arenberg co-founded IntraEAR, Inc., a drug delivery medical device company in 1996 and served as the company’s Vice President of Sales, Marketing and Business Development until the company was sold to DURECT in 1999. Mr. Arenberg holds an M.B.A. from the Leavey School of Business at Santa Clara University and a J.D. from the University of Denver. 





Judy Joice
Senior Vice President, Operations and Corporate Quality Assurance 



Judy Joice, Senior Vice President, Operations and Corporate Quality Assurance, joined DURECT in 2007 and has over 25 years experience in the pharmaceutical industry with such companies as Nektar Therapeutics, Oread and Syntex Research. During her career, Ms. Joice has gained broad experience in developing, implementing and managing all aspects of company-wide quality systems and compliance functions, ranging from drug development through commercial manufacturing. Ms. Joice has a B.S. in Chemistry from California State University. 





WeiQi Lin, M.D., Ph.D.
Senior Vice President, Research and Development, R&D Business Development & Principal Scientist 



WeiQi Lin, M.D., Ph.D. joined DURECT in 2008 and is Senior Vice President, Research and Development, R&D Business Development & Principal Scientist. Dr. Lin began her career at ALZA, where she worked for 10 years, developing an extensive knowledge of drug delivery systems which has proven invaluable to her role at DURECT. While at ALZA, she was a member of a team which was responsible for product pipeline selection and evaluation. After ALZA and prior to joining DURECT, she was a co-founder of a company and acted as a consultant. As a result, she has over 17 years of experience in industry. After graduation, she worked as a lecturer for 4 years at both Shanghai Medical University and Beijing Medical University. She received her M.D. from Shanghai Medical University, was a visiting scholar at the Medical College of Virginia and received her Ph.D. Pharm/Tox from the Medical College of Virginia. 





David J. Ellis, M.D., Ph.D.
Vice President, Clinical Development 



Dr. Ellis joined DURECT in November 2011 and has over 45 years of experience in the pharmaceutical industry with companies such as Syntex, ALZA Corporation, Neurex Corporation, Elan Pharmaceuticals, ARYx Therapeutics and Relypsa. During his career, Dr. Ellis has been involved in 5 NDA submissions and approvals, and has extensive experience in clinical trial design, execution and reporting. Dr. Ellis has a B.S. in Chemistry from Colorado State University, a Ph.D. in Organic Chemistry from the University of California, Berkeley, and an M.D. from the University of California, San Francisco. 





John W. Gibson, M.S.
Vice President, Birmingham Operations and Principal Scientist 



John W. Gibson, M.S., Vice President, Birmingham Operations and Principal Scientist, has over 30 years of pharmaceutical product development experience involving biodegradable excipients and injectable, long-acting formulations. Mr. Gibson joined DURECT in 2001 as Executive Director of Product Development and assumed management responsiblity for DURECT’s Birmingham operations in 2005. Prior to joining DURECT, from 1974 through 2000, Mr. Gibson held a variety of technical and management positions with Southern Biosystems, Eastman Chemical Company, Eli Lilly and Company, and Southern Research Institute. Mr. Gibson received his B.S. and M.S. in Chemistry from the University of Alabama at Birmingham. He has numerous scientific publications and is the inventor of several U.S. and foreign patents. 





Steve Helmer, J.D.
Vice President, Chief Patent Counsel 



Steve Helmer joined DURECT in 2010 and is Vice President, Chief Patent Counsel. Mr. Helmer has over 17 years of experience as a patent attorney. After law school, he worked at the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office for 2 years, and then was a patent attorney at various law firms for the next 8 years. At that point, Steve switched over to the corporate side as patent counsel for Nektar Therapeutics for 5 years, followed by one year at Life Technologies prior to joining DURECT. Steve received his J.D. from the University of Minnesota Law School (cum laude) and received an M.S. in Biotechnology from Johns Hopkins University, and a B.S. in Chemical Engineering from Michigan Technological University (magna cum laude). 





Robert M. Janosky, M.B.A.
Vice President, Strategic Planning & Business Development 



Robert M. Janosky, MBA, Vice President of Strategic Planning & Business Development, joined DURECT in 2016 and brings over 20 years of global commercial development, strategic planning, marketing and sales experience in the pharmaceuticals industry. Over his career, Mr. Janosky has been involved in over 10 product launches. In the past decade, Mr. Janosky led the commercial development, marketing and business analytics departments for several emerging pharmaceutical companies including Jazz Pharmaceuticals, Durect and Vivus. Mr. Janosky started his career in sales for Wyeth Laboratories and held management roles in market planning and marketing for Johnson & Johnson and ALZA Corporation. After obtaining his bachelors degree in biochemistry from the University of Vermont, Mr. Janosky conducted basic research at Massachusetts General Hospital before transitioning to industry. Mr. Janosky received his masters in finance and marketing from the Simon Business School at the University of Rochester. 





Jian Li, M.B.A.
Vice President, Finance and Corporate Controller 



Jian Li has served as our Vice President of Finance and Corporate Controller since December 2003.
Previously, Ms. Li served as our Corporate Controller from April 2001 to December 2003, Assistant Controller from December 2000 to April 2001 and our Accounting Manager from March 2000 to December 2000. Prior to joining DURECT, she held various positions at Elan Pharmaceuticals in California and GTE Hawaiian Telephone in Honolulu, Hawaii in the roles of Financial Analyst, Accountant and Marketing Analyst. Ms. Li holds an M.B.A. from the University of Hawaii at Manoa. She is also a Certified Public Accountant and a member of American Institute of Certified Public Accountants. 





Andrew R. Miksztal, Ph.D.
Vice President, Pharmaceutical Research and Development 



Dr. Miksztal has over 24 years of pharmaceutical product development experience. He joined DURECT in March 2000 as Senior Director of Pharmaceutical Development, and in October 2000 was promoted to Executive Director. Prior to joining DURECT, Dr. Miksztal was the Associate Director of the Pharmaceutical Analysis Department at Oread Laboratories from 1996 to 2000, a Senior Scientist in Pharmaceutical Research at Roche Bioscience from 1995 to 1996, and a Scientist in the Preformulation and Pharmaceutical Analysis Departments at Syntex Research from 1987 to 1995. Dr. Miksztal earned his Ph.D. degree in Chemistry from Rutgers University, and completed an NIH postdoctoral research fellowship in the Chemistry Department at the University of California, San Diego. He has numerous scientific publications and is the inventor of several U.S. and foreign patents. 









 

















 © 2000-2017 DURECT Corporation


BUSINESS DEVELOPMENT | CAREERS | CONTACT | LEGAL NOTICE | PRIVACY POLICY 








